California, session 20252026, AB1102.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 57014 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:57014. (a) On or before January 1, 2027, the Department of Toxic Substances Control and the State Water Resources Control Board shall submit a report to the Legislature that includes all contaminated sites that are vulnerable to sea level rise and groundwater rise and when the vulnerability assessment will be, or has been, completed.(b) (1) A report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(2) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this section is repealed on January 1, 2031.SECTION 1.Section 65940.4 is added to the Government Code, to read:65940.4.(a)A proponent of a new development shall complete a sea level rise and groundwater rise risk assessment as part of the application to a public agency if the proposed development will be within 1,000 feet of a contaminated site that has been identified by the Department of Toxics and Substances Control, the State Water Resources Control Board, or a local government and will be within an area vulnerable to groundwater rise or sea level rise.(b)For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1)“Groundwater rise” means five feet of groundwater rise, as determined by the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration, the Ocean Protection Council, the United States Geological Survey, the University of California, or a local government’s coastal hazards vulnerability assessment.(2)“Sea level rise” means five feet of sea level rise, as determined by the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration, the Ocean Protection Council, the United States Geological Survey, the University of California, or a local government’s coastal hazards vulnerability assessment.(c)The risk assessment completed pursuant to this section shall be for informational purposes only.SEC. 2.No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because a local agency or school district has the authority to levy service charges, fees, or assessments sufficient to pay for the program or level of service mandated by this act, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code.